test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lyeme_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - lyeme: # eres
    lyeme+N+Sg+Nom: lyeme
    lyeme+N+Sg+Gen: luámmán
    lyeme+N+Sg+Acc: luámmán
    lyeme+N+Sg+Ill: luáˊṃánân
    lyeme+N+Sg+Loc: luáˊṃánist
    lyeme+N+Sg+Com: luáˊṃánáin
    lyeme+N+Sg+Abe: luámmánttáá
    lyeme+N+Ess: [luáˊmánin, lyemeen]
    lyeme+N+Par: [luáˊmánid, lyemeed]
    lyeme+N+Pl+Nom: luáˊṃáneh
    lyeme+N+Pl+Gen: luáˊṃánij
    lyeme+N+Pl+Acc: luáˊṃánijd
    lyeme+N+Pl+Ill: luáˊṃánáid
    lyeme+N+Pl+Loc: luáˊṃánijn
    lyeme+N+Pl+Com: luáˊṃánijguin
    lyeme+N+Pl+Abe: luáˊṃánijttáá


  Noun - njuovčâ: # eres
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuovčâ
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuohˊčâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuohˊčâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuohˊčâmân
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuohˊčâmist
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Com: njuohˊčâmáin
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuohˊčâmttáá
    njuovčâ+N+Ess: njuovčân
    njuovčâ+N+Par: njuovčâd
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuohˊčâmeh
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Gen: njuohˊčâmij
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuohˊčâmijd
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuohˊčâmáid
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuohˊčâmijn
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Com: njuohˊčâmijguin
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuohˊčâmijttáá



  Noun - siämu: # eres - ok
    siämu+N+Sg+Nom: siämu
    siämu+N+Sg+Gen: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Acc: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Ill: siäˊṃunân
    siämu+N+Sg+Loc: siäˊṃunist
    siämu+N+Sg+Com: siäˊṃunáin
    siämu+N+Sg+Abe: siämmunttáá
    siämu+N+Ess: [siämun, siäˊṃunin]
    siämu+N+Par: [siämud, siäˊṃunid]
    siämu+N+Pl+Nom: siäˊṃuneh
    siämu+N+Pl+Gen: siäˊṃunij
    siämu+N+Pl+Acc: siäˊṃunijd
    siämu+N+Pl+Ill: siäˊṃunáid
    siämu+N+Pl+Loc: siäˊṃunijn
    siämu+N+Pl+Com: siäˊṃunijguin
    siämu+N+Pl+Abe: siäˊṃunijttáá


  Noun - siemâ: # eres - ok
    siemâ+N+Sg+Nom: siemâ
    siemâ+N+Sg+Gen: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Acc: siemmân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Ill: sieˊṃânân
    siemâ+N+Sg+Loc: sieˊṃânist
    siemâ+N+Sg+Com: sieˊṃânáin
    siemâ+N+Sg+Abe: siemmânttáá
    siemâ+N+Ess: [siemân, sieˊṃânin]
    siemâ+N+Par: [siemâd, sieˊṃânid]
    siemâ+N+Pl+Nom: sieˊṃâneh
    siemâ+N+Pl+Gen: sieˊṃânij
    siemâ+N+Pl+Acc: sieˊṃânijd
    siemâ+N+Pl+Ill: sieˊṃânáid
    siemâ+N+Pl+Loc: sieˊṃânijn
    siemâ+N+Pl+Com: sieˊṃânijguin
    siemâ+N+Pl+Abe: sieˊṃânijttáá
